Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 3 Protection of the Ward

29-4-20.
Rights of the ward; impact on voting and testamentary capacity.

In every guardianship, the ward has the right to:

A qualified guardian who acts in the best interest of the ward;

A guardian who is reasonably accessible to the ward;

Have the ward’s property utilized to provide adequately for the ward’s support, care, education, health, and welfare;

Communicate freely and privately with persons other than the guardian, except as otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Individually, or through the ward’s representative or legal counsel, bring an action relating to the guardianship, including the right to file a petition alleging that the ward is being unjustly denied a right or privilege granted by this chapter and Chapter 5 of this title and including the right to bring an action to modify or terminate the guardianship pursuant to the provisions of Code Sections 29-4-41 and 29-4-42;

The least restrictive form of guardianship assistance, taking into consideration the ward’s functional limitations, personal needs, and preferences; and

Be restored to capacity at the earliest possible time.

The appointment of a guardian is not a determination regarding the right of the ward to vote.

The appointment of a guardian is not a determination that the ward lacks testamentary capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

29-4-21.
Rights and privileges removed from ward upon appointment of guardian.

Unless the court’s order specifies that one or more of the following powers are to be retained by the ward, the appointment of a guardian shall remove from the ward the power to:

Contract marriage;

Make, modify, or terminate other contracts;

Consent to medical treatment;

Establish a residence or dwelling place;

Change domicile;

Revoke a revocable trust established by the ward; and

Bring or defend any action at law or equity, except an action relating to the guardianship.

The mere appointment of a guardian does not revoke the powers of an agent who was previously appointed by the ward to act as an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, a health care agent under an advance directive for health care, or a mental health care agent under a psychiatric advance directive.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 9/HB 24; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-7/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in subsection (b), substituted “health care, a health care agent” for “health care or health care agent” and added “, or a mental health care agent under a psychiatric advance directive” at the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

29-4-22.
Decisions on ward’s well-being; obligations of guardian; liability of guardian.

Except as otherwise provided by law or by the court, a guardian shall make decisions regarding the ward’s support, care, education, health, and welfare. A guardian shall, to the extent feasible, encourage the ward to participate in decisions, act on the ward’s own behalf, and develop or regain the capacity to manage the ward’s personal affairs. To the extent known, a guardian, in making decisions, shall consider the expressed desires and personal values of the ward. A guardian shall at all times act as a fiduciary in the ward’s best interest and exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence.

A guardian shall:

Respect the rights and dignity of the ward;

Become or remain personally acquainted with the ward and maintain sufficient contact with the ward to know of the ward’s capacities, limitations, needs, opportunities, and physical and mental health;

If necessary, petition to have a conservator appointed;

Endeavor to cooperate with the conservator, if any;

Take reasonable care of the ward’s personal effects;

Arrange for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the ward, considering the ward’s needs and available resources;

Expend money of the ward that has been received by the guardian for the ward’s current needs for support, care, education, health, and welfare;

Conserve for the ward’s future needs any excess money of the ward received by the guardian; provided, however, that if a conservator has been appointed for the ward, the guardian shall pay to the conservator, at least quarterly, money to be conserved for the ward’s future needs;

Within 60 days after appointment and within 60 days after each anniversary date of appointment, file with the court and provide to the ward and to the conservator, if any, a personal status report concerning the ward, which shall include:

A description of the ward’s general condition, changes since the last report, and needs;

All addresses of the ward during the reporting period and the living arrangements of the ward for all addresses;

A description of the amount and expenditure of any funds that were received by the guardian pursuant to paragraph (7) of this subsection; and

Recommendations for any alteration in the guardianship order;

Promptly notify the court of any change in the ward’s condition that in the opinion of the guardian might require modification or termination of the guardianship;

Promptly notify the court of any conflict of interest between the ward and the guardian when the conflict arises or becomes known to the guardian and take any action as is required by Code Section 29-4-24; and

Keep the court informed of the guardian’s current address.

A guardian, solely by reason of the guardian-ward relationship, is not personally liable for:

The ward’s expenses or the expenses of those persons who are entitled to be supported by the ward;

Contracts entered into in the guardian’s fiduciary capacity;

The acts or omissions of the ward;

Obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the ward; or

Other acts or omissions occurring in the course of the guardianship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

29-4-23.
Powers and rights of guardian; appointment of guardian ad litem; coordination and cooperation with conservator or others.

Unless inconsistent with the terms of any court order relating to the guardianship, a guardian may:

Take custody of the person of the ward and establish the ward’s place of dwelling within this state;

Subject to Chapters 9, 20, and 36 of Title 31 and any other pertinent law, give any consents or approvals that may be necessary for medical or other professional care, counsel, treatment, or service for the ward;

Bring, defend, or participate in legal, equitable, or administrative proceedings, including alternative dispute resolution, as are appropriate for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the ward in the name of or on behalf of the ward; and

Exercise those other powers reasonably necessary to provide adequately for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the ward.

At the time of the appointment of the guardian or at any time thereafter, any of the following powers may be specifically granted by the court to the guardian upon such notice, if any, as the court shall determine, provided that no disposition of the ward’s property shall be made without the involvement of a conservator, if any:

To establish the ward’s place of dwelling outside this state;

To change the jurisdiction of the guardianship to another county in this state that is the county of the ward’s place of dwelling, pursuant to Code Section 29-4-80;

To change the domicile of the ward to the ward’s or the guardian’s place of dwelling, in the determination of which the court shall consider the tax ramifications and succession and inheritance rights of the ward and other parties;

To bring an action for the divorce of the ward based on any of the grounds listed in Code Section 19-5-3, except on the ground that the marriage is irretrievably broken;

To consent to the adoption of the ward;

To receive reasonable compensation from the estate of the ward for services rendered to the ward; and

If there is no conservator, to disclaim or renounce any property or interest in property of the ward in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 53-1-20.

Before granting any of the powers described in subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the ward.

In granting any of the powers described in subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall consider the property rights of the ward and the views of the conservator, if any, or, if there is no conservator, of others who have custody of the ward’s property.

In performing any of the acts described in this Code section, the guardian shall act in coordination and cooperation with the conservator or, if there is no conservator, with others who have custody of the ward’s property.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

29-4-24.
Disclosure of conflicts of interest.

The guardian must promptly disclose any conflict of interest between the guardian and the ward when it arises or becomes known to the guardian and seek the court’s determination as to whether the conflict is insubstantial or if it is in the best interest of the ward for the guardian to continue to serve.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-25.
Oath or affirmation of guardian.

Before entering upon the duties of the appointment, every guardian appointed pursuant to the terms of this chapter shall take an oath or affirmation before the court to perform well and truly the duties required of a guardian and to account faithfully for the estate. The oath or affirmation of a guardian may be subscribed before the judge or clerk of any probate court of this state. The judge of the probate court who appoints the guardian shall have the authority to grant a commission to a judge or clerk of any court of record of any other state to administer the oath or affirmation.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.